Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1724
Mobile massage therapy establishment; owner; duties.

The owner of each mobile massage therapy establishment shall have full responsibility for ensuring that the establishment is operated in compliance with all applicable laws, rules, and regulations and shall be liable for any and all violations occurring in the establishment.

Laws 2019, LB244, § 13.